Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 295 of Title 17, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Bulk-power system” means:


a. facilities and control systems necessary to operate an


interconnected electricity energy transmission network


or portion thereof, and


b. electric energy from generation facilities needed to


maintain transmission system reliability;

Req. No. 3551 Page 1


2. “Capacity” means the fraction of the installed capacity of


an electric generation unit which can be relied on at a given time


to meet demand and is frequently measured either in terms of the


physical output capacity of the unit such as kilowatt (kW), megawatt


(MW), or gigawatt (GW) or as the fractional output percentage of the


asset’s nameplate capacity;


3. “Effective load or demand carrying capacity” means an


electric generation unit’s contribution to reliability based on the


incremental quantity of load or demand that can be satisfied by


adding that resource asset to the electric power grid;


4. “Electric generation unit” means any asset used to generate


or store electricity, regardless of fuel source including, but not


limited to, coal, natural gas, nuclear fuel, hydroelectricity,


geothermal, wind, solar, hydrogen, or other applicable technologies.


It shall include, but is not limited to, pumped hydroelectric


storage, lithium-ion batteries, and any other device or asset used


to store energy for later use as electricity;


5. “Electric utility” means any person, firm, partnership, or


corporation that furnishes retail electric service to the public in


this state and is subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of the


Corporation Commission;


6. “Independent system operator” means a regional transmission


organization, independent system operator, independent transmission


provider, or other transmission organization finally approved by the

Req. No. 3551 Page 2


Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for the operation of


transmission facilities;


7. “Reliability” means a requirement, approved by the Federal


Energy Regulatory Commission, to provide for reliable operation of


the bulk-power system. It includes requirements for the operation


of existing bulk-power system facilities, including cybersecurity


protection, and the design of planned additions or modifications to


such facilities to the extent necessary to provide for reliable


operation of the bulk-power system. It does not include any


requirement to enlarge such facilities or to construct new


transmission capacity or generation capacity;


8. “Reliable operation” means operating the elements of the


bulk-power system within equipment and electric system thermal,


voltage, and stability limits so that instability, uncontrolled


separation, or cascading failures of such system will not occur as a


result of a sudden disturbance, including a cybersecurity incident,


or unanticipated failure of system elements;


9. “Retire” means any scale down, scale back, intent for lesser


usage, or any other similar action with respect to an electric


generation unit or a transmission asset;


10. “Transmission asset” means any and all equipment necessary


to transmit electricity from a new or existing electric generation


unit to the distribution network used to provide electricity to an


end consumer. It includes, but is not limited to, any and all

Req. No. 3551 Page 3


substations, inverters, transformers, transmission towers, and


additional transmission mileage operating above sixty-nine kilovolts


(69 kV); and


11. “Transmission organization” means a regional transmission


organization, independent system operator, independent transmission


provider, or other transmission organization finally approved by the


Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for the operation of


transmission facilities.


B. When a public utility requests a rate adjustment, the


Corporation Commission shall take into consideration the bulk-power


system reliability, energy capacity, on-demand dispatch ability,


useful life, intermittent operational nature, overall operational


costs including back end disposal costs, and environmental


compliance costs of each and every asset used for the production or


transmission of electric energy including, but not limited to, any


electric generation unit, transmission asset, and other related


assets in its determination of whether the costs and expenses of


related costs and expenses are fair, just, reasonable, and should be


approved for rate recovery.


C. In addition to the requirements of a petition requesting the


Commission to examine and determine the reasonableness of a proposed


increase in rates and charges pursuant to Section 152 of Title 17 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, the petition shall include the following:



Req. No. 3551 Page 4


1. A statement for each electric generation unit that is


proposed to be added to the generation portfolio which shall


include:


a. an evaluation of each generation unit’s potential


ability to reliably meet the applicant’s capacity


contributions to bulk-power system reliability during


times of peak demand,


b. an assessment of the potential estimated percentage


contribution of each generation unit in meeting the


applicant’s capacity contributions to bulk-power


system reliability during times of peak demand, and


c. a narrative that outlines the addition of each


electric generation unit when considered in


conjunction with any proposed retirement with respect


to any other electric generation and how this will


impact the applicant’s ability to meet capacity


contributions to bulk-power system reliability during


times of peak demand;


2. A statement for each electric generation unit that the


applicant proposes to retire which shall include:


a. an evaluation of each generation unit’s current


ability to reliably meet the electric utility’s


capacity contributions to bulk-power system


reliability during times of peak demand,

Req. No. 3551 Page 5


b. an assessment of the current estimated percentage


contribution of each generation unit in meeting the


applicant’s capacity contributions to bulk-power


system reliability during times of peak demand, and


c. a narrative that outlines how the scale down, less


frequent utilization, retirement, or removal of each


generation unit from the applicant’s portfolio when


considered in conjunction with any proposed addition


of an electric generation unit to the applicant’s


portfolio will impact the applicant’s ability to meet


its capacity contributions to bulk-power system


reliability during times of peak demand.


The statements in each of paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection


shall, to the best of the applicant’s ability, address the effective


load carrying capacity or effective demand carrying capacity of the


electric generation unit. Such information may be indicated as the


unforced or accredited capacity of the asset and the statement may


be provided by a transmission organization, the applicant, or an


agent thereof;


3. A statement for each transmission asset the applicant


proposes to build or acquire that includes an evaluation of each


transmission asset’s ability to meet its capability to support the


applicant’s capacity contributions to bulk-power system reliability


during times of peak demand. The statement shall, to the best of

Req. No. 3551 Page 6


the applicant’s ability, address how the transmission asset will


support the applicant’s capacity contributions to bulk-power system


reliability during times of peak demand. Such statement may be


provided by a transmission organization, the applicant, or an agent


thereof; and


4. A statement for each transmission asset the applicant


proposes to retire that includes an evaluation of each transmission


asset’s current ability to meet its capability to support the


applicant’s capacity contributions to bulk-power system reliability


during times of peak demand. Such statement may be provided by a


transmission organization, the applicant, or an agent thereof.


D. 1. The Corporation Commission shall not authorize or


approve the retirement of an electric generation unit in this state


until the applicant establishes, by clear and convincing evidence,


that it has available an equivalent megawatt capacity of


dispatchable firm power generation as replacement power in the


result of the proposed electric generation unit retirement. The


available megawatt capacity of dispatchable firm power may be


established by:


a. the construction and operation of a new generation


asset either within this state or outside this state,


b. any purchase power agreement, or


c. any other arrangement, including a combination of


subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph, that the

Req. No. 3551 Page 7


Commission determines will meet the applicant’s


capacity contributions to bulk-power system


reliability during times of peak demand.


2. The Corporation Commission may direct an electric utility to


submit an analysis of the actions necessary to extend the life of


each generating unit in the electric utility’s portfolio beyond the


planned retirement date for each generating unit. Such analysis may


include any matters as deemed necessary by the Commission.


E. Any applicant for an adjustment of electric utility rates


shall establish by clear and convincing evidence that:


1. Each electric generation unit or transmission asset that it


proposes to build or acquire shall fully meet its capacity


contributions to bulk-power system reliability during times of peak


demand; and


2. Each electric generation unit or transmission asset that it


proposes to retire will not negatively impact the applicant’s


ability to fully meet its capacity contributions to bulk-power


system reliability during times of peak demand.


F. 1. If the Corporation Commission approves an adjustment of


rates, it shall include in a separate finding that the applicant


meets the requirements pursuant to this section.


2. If the Commission finds that an electric generation unit or


transmission asset that the applicant proposes to build or acquire


fails to meet the requirements of this section, the Commission shall

Req. No. 3551 Page 8


determine what portion, if any, of the costs and expenses related to


and associated with that electric generation unit or transmission


asset are fair, just, and reasonable, and should be eligible for


rate recovery as well as the portion, if any, of the costs and


expenses that are not fair, just, or reasonable, and should not be


eligible for rate recovery.


3. The Commission, in its discretion, may approve in part, deny


in part, approve, or deny any portion of an applicant’s petition.


4. In any order approving an adjustment of rates, the


Commission shall include in a separate and distinct paragraph in


boldface type for each of the following that describes:


a. the total dollar amount of the increase in approved


rate recovery,


b. whether a rate of return on any electric generation


unit or transmission asset has been approved, the


amount of the rate of return reflected as a percentage


of the total dollar amount approved for such return


and the duration of such return, and


c. a summary of the total amount of the electric


generation unit and transmission asset costs and


expenses, if any, that have been denied for rate


recovery.


G. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the


disclosure of confidential information.

Req. No. 3551 Page 9


H. Any agreed order of settlement or similar instrument among


the parties shall not circumvent the requirements of this section or


any other applicable law and shall not abrogate the responsibility


of the Commission to make the findings pursuant to subsection F of


this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3551 CN 1/14/2026 3:20:18 PM

































Req. No. 3551 Page 10